dict/fr-moderne.aff
FLAG long
SFX yV N 55
SFX yV ire ire ire 21
SFX yV ire isant ire 22
SFX yV ire it nfire 23
SFX yV ire its nfire 24
SFX yV ire ite nfire 25
SFX yV ire ites nfire 26
SFX yV ire is cire 79
SFX yV ire ise cire 25
SFX yV ire ises cire 26
SFX yV ire i ffire 72
SFX yV ire is ire 27
SFX yV ire is ire 28
SFX yV ire it ire 29
SFX yV ire isons ire 30
SFX yV ire isez ire 31
SFX yV ire isent ire 32
SFX yV ire isais ire 33
SFX yV ire isais ire 34
SFX yV ire isait ire 35
SFX yV ire isions ire 36
SFX yV ire isiez ire 37
SFX yV ire isaient ire 38
SFX yV ire is ire 39
SFX yV ire is ire 40
SFX yV ire it ire 41
SFX yV ire îmes ire 42
SFX yV ire îtes ire 43
SFX yV ire irent ire 44
SFX yV ire irai ire 45
SFX yV ire iras ire 46
SFX yV ire ira ire 47
SFX yV ire irons ire 48
SFX yV ire irez ire 49
SFX yV ire iront ire 50
SFX yV ire irais ire 51
SFX yV ire irais ire 52
SFX yV ire irait ire 53
SFX yV ire irions ire 54
SFX yV ire iriez ire 55
SFX yV ire iraient ire 56
SFX yV ire ise ire 57
SFX yV ire ises ire 58
SFX yV ire ise ire 59
SFX yV ire isions ire 60
SFX yV ire isiez ire 61
SFX yV ire isent ire 62
SFX yV ire isse ire 63
SFX yV ire isses ire 64
SFX yV ire ît ire 65
SFX yV ire issions ire 66
SFX yV ire issiez ire 67
SFX yV ire issent ire 68
SFX yV ire is ire 69
SFX yV ire isons ire 70
SFX yV ire isez ire 71

SFX yW N 48
SFX yW ire ire rire 21
SFX yW ire iant rire 22
SFX yW ire i rire 72
SFX yW ire is rire 27
SFX yW ire is rire 28
SFX yW ire it rire 29
SFX yW ire ions rire 30
SFX yW ire iez rire 31
SFX yW ire ient rire 32
SFX yW ire iais rire 33
SFX yW ire iais rire 34
SFX yW ire iait rire 35
SFX yW ire iions rire 36
SFX yW ire iiez rire 37
SFX yW ire iaient rire 38
SFX yW ire is rire 39
SFX yW ire is rire 40
SFX yW ire it rire 41
SFX yW ire îmes rire 42
SFX yW ire îtes rire 43
SFX yW ire irent rire 44
SFX yW ire irai rire 45
SFX yW ire iras rire 46
SFX yW ire ira rire 47
SFX yW ire irons rire 48
SFX yW ire irez rire 49
SFX yW ire iront rire 50
SFX yW ire irais rire 51
SFX yW ire irais rire 52
SFX yW ire irait rire 53
SFX yW ire irions rire 54
SFX yW ire iriez rire 55
SFX yW ire iraient rire 56
SFX yW ire ie rire 57
SFX yW ire ies rire 58
SFX yW ire ie rire 59
SFX yW ire iions rire 60
SFX yW ire iiez rire 61
SFX yW ire ient rire 62
SFX yW ire isse rire 63
SFX yW ire isses rire 64
SFX yW ire ît rire 65
SFX yW ire issions rire 66
SFX yW ire issiez rire 67
SFX yW ire issent rire 68
SFX yW ire is rire 69
SFX yW ire ions rire 70
SFX yW ire iez rire 71

SFX yX Y 33
SFX yX nuire nuire/28 nuire 21
SFX yX nuire nuisant/28 nuire 22
SFX yX nuire nui nuire 72
SFX yX nuire nuit/28 nuire 29
SFX yX nuire nuisons nuire 30
SFX yX nuire nuisez nuire 31
SFX yX nuire nuisent/28 nuire 32
SFX yX nuire nuisait/28 nuire 35
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire 36
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire 37
SFX yX nuire nuisaient/28 nuire 38
SFX yX nuire nuisit/28 nuire 41
SFX yX nuire nuisîmes nuire 42
SFX yX nuire nuisîtes nuire 43
SFX yX nuire nuisirent/28 nuire 44
SFX yX nuire nuira/28 nuire 47
SFX yX nuire nuirons nuire 48
SFX yX nuire nuirez nuire 49
SFX yX nuire nuiront/28 nuire 50
SFX yX nuire nuirait/28 nuire 53
SFX yX nuire nuirions nuire 54
SFX yX nuire nuiriez nuire 55
SFX yX nuire nuiraient/28 nuire 56
SFX yX nuire nuise/28 nuire 59
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire 60
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire 61
SFX yX nuire nuisent/28 nuire 62
SFX yX nuire nuisît/28 nuire 65
SFX yX nuire nuisissions nuire 66
SFX yX nuire nuisissiez nuire 67
SFX yX nuire nuisissent/28 nuire 68
SFX yX nuire nuisons-nous nuire 80
SFX yX nuire nuisez-vous nuire 81

SFX yY Y 4
SFX yY ccire ccire/16 occire 21
SFX yY ccire ccis/41 occire 79
SFX yY ccire ccise/41 occire 25
SFX yY ccire ccises/41 occire 26

SFX yZ N 9
SFX yZ rire rire rire 21
SFX yZ rire rit rire 23
SFX yZ rire rits rire 24
SFX yZ rire rite rire 25
SFX yZ rire rites rire 26
SFX yZ rire ris rire 27
SFX yZ rire ris rire 28
SFX yZ rire rit rire 29
SFX yZ rire ris rire 69

SFX q+ Y 32
SFX q+ enir enu/41 enir 23
SFX q+ enir enus/41 enir 24
SFX q+ enir enue/41 enir 25
SFX q+ enir enues/41 enir 26
SFX q+ tir ti/41 tir 23
SFX q+ tir tis/41 tir 24
SFX q+ tir tie/41 tir 25
SFX q+ tir ties/41 tir 26
SFX q+ courir couru/41 courir 23
SFX q+ courir courus/41 courir 24
SFX q+ courir courue/41 courir 25
SFX q+ courir courues/41 courir 26
SFX q+ ivre écu vivre 23
SFX q+ ivre écus vivre 24
SFX q+ ivre écue vivre 25
SFX q+ ivre écues vivre 26
SFX q+ aire u aire 23
SFX q+ aire us aire 24
SFX q+ aire ue aire 25
SFX q+ aire ues aire 26
SFX q+ dre du dre 23
SFX q+ dre dus dre 24
SFX q+ dre due dre 25
SFX q+ dre dues dre 26
SFX q+ valoir valu .valoir 23
SFX q+ valoir valus .valoir 24
SFX q+ valoir value .valoir 25
SFX q+ valoir values .valoir 26
SFX q+ aître u/41 aître 23
SFX q+ aître us/41 aître 24
SFX q+ aître ue/41 aître 25
SFX q+ aître ues/41 aître 26

SFX q. Y 8
SFX q. enir enu/41 enir 72
SFX q. tir ti/41 tir 72
SFX q. courir couru/41 courir 72
SFX q. ivre écu vivre 72
SFX q. aire u aire 72
SFX q. dre du dre 72
SFX q. valoir valu/41 .valoir 72
SFX q. aître u/41 aître 72
